Idaho, session 2025, H0429.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-6513, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6513. SUBDIVISION ORDINANCE. Each governing board shall provide,
by ordinance adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with the notice and
hearing procedures provided under section 67-6509, Idaho Code, for stan-
dards and for the processing of applications for subdivision permits under
sections 50-1301 through 50-1329, Idaho Code. Each such ordinance may pro-
vide for mitigation of the effects of subdivision development on the ability
of political subdivisions of the state, including school districts, to de-
liver services without compromising quality of service delivery to current
residents or imposing substantial additional costs upon current residents
to accommodate the proposed subdivision. Fees established for purposes of
mitigating the financial impacts of development must comply with the provi-
sions of chapter 82, title 67, Idaho Code. A school district that receives
moneys pursuant to the provisions of this section shall adopt a capacity
plan and shall expend such moneys only in a manner consistent with the ca-
pacity plan to increase the school district's student capacity. Denial of a
subdivision permit or approval of a subdivision permit with conditions unac-
ceptable to the landowner may be subject to the regulatory taking analysis
provided for by section 67-8003, Idaho Code, consistent with the require-
ments established thereby.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.